Utah statutes.
4-14-6.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules.

The department may, by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, adopt rules to:

(1)  declare as a pest any form of plant or animal life that is injurious to health or the environment, except:

(a)  a human being; or

(b)  a bacteria, virus, or other microorganism on or in a living person or animal;

(2)  establish, in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the EPA under 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136w(c)(2), whether pesticides registered for special local needs under the authority of 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136v(c) are highly toxic to man;

(3)  establish, consistent with EPA regulations, that certain pesticides or quantities of substances contained in these pesticides are injurious to the environment;

(4)  adopt a list of "restricted use pesticides" for the state or designated areas within the state if it determines upon substantial evidence presented at a public hearing and upon recommendation of the pesticide committee that restricted use is necessary to prevent damage to property or to the environment;

(5)  establish qualifications for a pesticide applicator business; and

(6)  adopt any rule, not inconsistent with federal regulations promulgated under FIFRA,  considered necessary to administer and enforce this chapter, including  rules relating to the sale, distribution, use, and disposition of pesticides if necessary to prevent damage and to protect the public health.

